District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.113

Time limits on initiation of process.

The process of recalling an elected official may not be initiated within the first 365 days nor the last 365 days of his or her term of office. Nor may the process be initiated within 1 year after a recall election has been determined in his or her favor.

History

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-293.
1973 Ed., § 1-193.